Utah statutes.
49-11-621.   Change in employer -- Eligibility for retirement.

(1)  If a participating employer is dissolved, consolidated, merged, or is structurally changed in any way, but similar services are provided by the same members after the change, the members may not be considered terminated for purposes of eligibility for retirement until the members actually terminate and are otherwise eligible for retirement.

(2)  The board may adopt rules to implement this section.



Enacted by Chapter 116, 2005 General Session

